Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-2247.03
Resident representative, defined.

Resident representative means:

(1) An individual chosen by the resident to act on behalf of the resident in order to support the resident in decisionmaking; access medical, social, or other personal information of the resident; manage financial matters; or receive notifications; or

(2) A person authorized by state or federal law, including, but not limited to, agents under a power of attorney, representative payees, and other fiduciaries, to act on behalf of the resident in order to support the resident in decisionmaking; access medical, social, or other personal information of the resident; manage financial matters; or receive notifications.

Laws 2018, LB903, § 12.